Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-929.02
Assault on a health care professional; hospital and health clinic; sign required.

Every hospital and health clinic shall display at all times in a prominent place a printed sign with a minimum height of twenty inches and a minimum width of fourteen inches, with each letter to be a minimum of one-fourth inch in height, which shall read as follows:

WARNING: ASSAULTING A HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL WHO IS ENGAGED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF HIS OR HER OFFICIAL DUTIES, INCLUDING STRIKING A HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL WITH ANY BODILY FLUID, IS A SERIOUS CRIME WHICH MAY BE PUNISHABLE AS A FELONY.

Laws 2012, LB677, § 5;

Laws 2018, LB913, § 1.